Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6085.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 205e. (1) A zoning ordinance must not restrict the connection of an accessory dwelling unit to the sewer system of the dwelling unit to which the accessory dwelling unit is incidental if both of the following apply: (a) The accessory dwelling unit is owned by the same person as the dwelling unit to which the accessory dwelling unit is incidental. (b) The accessory dwelling unit is located on the same parcel as the dwelling unit to which the accessory dwelling unit is incidental. (2) As used in this section, "accessory dwelling unit" means a secondary dwelling unit, whether constructed on-site or off-site, that is incidental to another dwelling unit located on the same parcel of real property.